Washington statutes.
RCW 36.80.015

Office at county seat—Records.

The county road engineer shall keep an office at the county seat. The records under the authority of the county road engineer shall be public records, shall be subject to the control of the county road engineer, and shall at all proper times be open to the inspection and examination of the public.

[ 2016 c 19 s 3; 2009 c 105 s 5; 1963 c 4 s 36.80.015. Prior: 1955 c 9 s 1; prior: 1895 c 77 s 10; RRS s 4148.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 19: See note following RCW 36.87.120.